Maryland, session 2025, HB0228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–913.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Veterans Trust Fund.
(b) (1) There is a Maryland Veterans Trust established for the purpose of
providing monetary and other assistance to:
(i) veterans and their families; [and]
(ii) MEMBERS OF THE MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD AND
THEIR FAMILIES; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 617 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) public and private programs that support veterans and their
families.
(2) There is a Maryland Veterans Trust Fund.
(e) Money in the Fund may only be used to:
(1) make grants and loans under § 9–914.2(a)(3) of this subtitle;
(2) be invested under § 9–914.3(b) of this subtitle; and
(3) pay the costs of administering the Fund through distribution to an
administrative cost account in the Department.
9–914.2.
(a) The Trust shall have the powers and duties to:
(3) expend money from the Fund to provide grants or loans to:
(i) veterans and their families;
(ii) MEMBERS OF THE MARYLAND NATIONAL GUARD AND
THEIR FAMILIES;
(III) public and private programs that support veterans and their
families; or
[(iii)] (IV) any other programs that the Trust considers to be within
the purpose for which the Trust is established;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –